Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1213.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2102 of Title 30 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 2102. Rules and regulations.* * *(e) Snatch fishing, foul hooking and snag fishing.--Rules and regulations may also be promulgated that involve the methods of taking fish by snatching, foul hooking or snagging. Any person violating any rule or regulation promulgated under this subsection commits a summary offense of the first degree.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.123456789101112131415